Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 50. Industrial Development

154.50-020.
Legislative findings of fact — Purpose of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030.

It is hereby found, determined, and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the general welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth is directly related to the economic and employment opportunities available to them, and it is the legitimate business of the Kentucky state government to provide to the maximum extent practicable, the impetus for and assistance to economic development in the Commonwealth through the provision of monetary assistance to industrial entities for industrial improvement projects which will directly and proximately cause the improvement and retention of industry and employment in the Commonwealth.

It is hereby further found, determined, and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the improvement and retention of manufacturing, processing, and assembling facilities will proximately result in:

The creation or retention of employment opportunities; or

The creation or retention of tax revenues to the Commonwealth, as a taxing entity, which would not be available to the citizens of the Commonwealth or received by the Commonwealth but for the improvement and retention of the facilities and which creation or retention of employment opportunities or tax revenues are hereby found, determined, and declared to constitute receipt of value by the Commonwealth for the monetary assistance which it may provide pursuant to KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030 to industrial entities undertaking industrial improvement projects located in this state.

It is the purpose of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030 to promote and foster the gainful employment, business, and economic development opportunities and general welfare of the citizens and residents of the Commonwealth which will result in the alleviation or prevention of unemployment and the general stability of the economy of Kentucky. This purpose will be accomplished by the creation of the authority to enable the Commonwealth to provide monetary assistance to industrial entities, for the improvement and retention of industrial manufacturing, processing, or assembling facilities in the Commonwealth which, in return, will create or retain employment opportunities for citizens of the Commonwealth or will create or retain tax revenues. The authority granted by KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030 and the purposes to be accomplished by KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030 are hereby declared to be public purposes for which public money may be expended.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 306, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

154.50-030.
Expenditure of funds to industrial entities.

In carrying out the purposes of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030, and in providing for the expenditure of funds to industrial entities to assist in the implementation of an industrial improvement project, the cabinet may find that the cost may be paid in whole or in part out of funds directly appropriated to the responsible state agency for that purpose or by any other method approved by the Governor and the General Assembly.

In carrying out the purposes of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030, and in providing for the expenditure of funds to industrial entities which are appropriated by the General Assembly to assist in the implementation of an industrial improvement project, the cabinet may determine the amount of monetary assistance to be provided by reference to any formula or other objective standard which is based on target levels of employment, projected interest rates or other financing costs, projected levels of investment by the industrial entity or any other objective criteria deemed appropriate by the cabinet under the circumstances.

In carrying out the purposes of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030, the expenditure of funds to industrial entities to assist in the implementation of an industrial improvement project may only be made if:
(3) (a)

In carrying out the purposes of KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030, the expenditure of funds to industrial entities to assist in the implementation of an industrial improvement project may only be made if:

There is a finding by the cabinet, that, based upon reasonable investigation, the industrial improvement project cannot be funded out of existing appropriations and is in the best interest of the Commonwealth because it is reasonably expected to result in the creation or retention in whole or in part of employment opportunities or of tax revenues;

The industrial improvement project is separately approved in writing by the Governor;

The industrial improvement project is separately approved by the General Assembly; and

There is an agreement in writing by the subject industrial entity to engage in the industrial improvement project setting forth the basis upon which the amount of monetary assistance provided pursuant to KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030 is determined.

It is hereby determined and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the provisions and requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection provide for the receipt by the Commonwealth of fair market value for any monetary assistance provided pursuant to KRS 154.50-020 to 154.50-030.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 306, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.